West Virginia, session 2025, SB649.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia:That Chapter 11, Acts of the Legislature, Regular Session, 2024, known as the budget bill, fund 0437, fiscal year 2025, organization 0513, be supplemented and amended to read as follows: Title II – Appropriations. Section 1. Appropriations from general revenue. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH - Office of the Inspector General (W.V. Code Chapter 16B)Fund 0437 FY 2025 Org 0513							General					Appro-		Revenue					priation		Fund Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	5,583,690Unclassified			09900		57,469Current Expenses			13000		1,583,603Current Expenses – Surplus			13099		2,000,000	Total					$	9,224,762		From the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0437, appropriation 13000), $73,065 shall be used for informal dispute resolution relating to nursing home administrative appeals, and $650,000 shall be transferred to OIG fund 5209.		Notwithstanding any provisions of this budget to the contrary, the Inspector General shall have the ability to transfer funds between all appropriations. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home